src/fst/phonology.twolc
! TODO: WG: kk:k, kk4:h, Lengthening: kk:kk, kk4:hh (jf. hfst-twolc test)

!!€ la^RVvkk4â^WG^RLEN
!!€ laav0hâ00


"xyy:xy gradation A"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@** =   há%^RVi4ttás%^ÁI
Cy:0 <=> :Vow (Vow:) Cx: _ Cz: (%^RC:) WeakGrade \%^CLEN: ; !! 1) WG
                     Cx: _ Cz:  ConsonantShorting    ;      !! 2) CSH  !he%^RVi4ttug
                     Cx: _ Cz:  i: %^FVD: %^CSH:     ;      !! 3) 
      where Cx in ( j i4 i4 j j i4 i4 i4 i4 l l l l l l l m m m n n n ŋ r r r r r r r r v v v v v ) 
            Cy in ( p c  s  s t k  l  p  t  c k p s t č š p č s c s t k c č p k s t č š c d k p t ) 
            Cz in ( p c  s  s t k  l  p  t  c k p s t č š p č s c s t k c č p k s t č š c d k p t ) 
      matched ;

!!€ á^RVrppu^WG^RLEN>
!!€ áár0pu00>
!!€ á^RVrppu^WG^RVSH>ttáá
!!€ á0r0pu00>ttáá
!!€ riänttus^WG>
!!€ riän0tus0>



"č:0 in čč4 consonant gradation when CLEN"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@** = when čč4
č:0 <=> Vow: _ č4:  WeakGrade %^CLEN: ; ! RC

! luččâ:luujáin 
!!€ lu^RVčč4â^WG^RLEN^SVLOW>in
!!€ luu0já000>in


"From i4j to j when WG and CSH"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@** = e.g. sai4joos:sajoos
i4:0 <=> Vow: _   j: WeakGrade ;                           !! 1) when WG
         Vow: _   j: ConsonantShorting ;                   !! 2) when CSH 
         Vow  _ n j (%^CLEN:) (%^RLEN:) %^SVSH: [%>|.#.] ; !! 3) ?
         



"xx:x consonant gradation and shortening and x:x shortening"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@** =   weak grade **or** consonant shortening (Both in same rule)
Cx:0 <=> Vow: _ Cy: (%^RC:) WeakGrade         \%^CLEN: ; !! 1) when WG
         Vow: _ Cy: ConsonantShorting \%^CLEN: ; !! 2) when CSH  
	where Cx in ( b c c  č  č d đ f g h j k k  l m n ŋ p p  r s š v z ž ) !t in tt:t rule
	      Cy in ( b c c4 č4 č d đ f g h j k k4 l m n ŋ p p4 r s š v z ž ) 
		  matched ;

!! *Tests:*
!kurrâ kuurân
!!€ ku^RVrrâ^CSH^RLEN>n
!!€ kuu0râ00>n
!sollâ soolân
!!€ so^RVllâ^CSH^RLEN>n
!!€ soo0lâ00>n
!!€ vi^RVššâ^CSH^RVSH>vettee
!!€ vi00šâ00>vettee
!!€ la^RVs^RCe^SVtt^RLEN^SLEN>vettee
!!€ laas0ee0t00>vettee
!cuozzâ:cuozâ
!!€ cuozzâ^WG^RLEN>
!!€ cuo0zâ00>
!váddu:váádun
!!€ vá^RVddu^CSH^RLEN>n
!!€ váá0du00>n
!!€ haavvâr^CSH^SVSH>ist
!!€ ha00vâr00>ist
!!€ pottáák^SC^CSH^SVSH>ist
!!€ po0t0ákk00>ist
! kahhaan:kahanân - where is this? "xx:x" Cx:0 <=> _ Cx ConsonantShorting ; where Cx in h ;
!!€ kahhaan^CSH^SVSH>ân
!!€ ka0h0an00>ân
 

"tt:t  - final consonant and consonant gradation"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@**  = consonant gradation, and 3syll verbs in -tt lose t in front of cns-initial suff
t:0 <=> Vow:                _ [t:|t4:] WeakGrade          \%^CLEN: ;      !! 1) WG, not CLEN
        Vow:                _ [t:|t4:] ConsonantShorting  \%^CLEN: ;      !! 2) CSH
        [RealVow:|%^SV:|%>] _ [t:|t4:] (i6:) Triggers:* [.#.| %>] \Vow ;  !! 3) uáivátt : uáivát
        [RealVow:|%^SV:]    _ [t:|t4:] m     Triggers:* [.#.| %>]  ;      !! 4) olášuttem:olášutmân
        Vow: Vow:           _  t:                          %> â n  ;      !! 5) uáiváátt>ân uáiváátân
       [.#.|#] Cns:* :Vow+ Cns:+ :Vow+  Cns:+ i _  t:      %> i [j|ž|š] ; !! 6) uápásmittijm>uápásmitijm

!!€ las^RCe^SVtt^CLEN^SLEN>
!!€ lassee0t00>

"nnj to nj shortening weak grade and consonant shortening"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@** =  special rule, e.g. konnjâl -> konjâlân puánnjá
n:0 <=> n _ j ConsonantShorting \%^CLEN: ; ! RC !! 1)  vinnjooh:vinjohân
        n _ j WeakGrade \%^CLEN: ;         ! RC !! 2)lonnjâ:loonjáin 


"Word final consonant deletion"
!!  **RULE: @RULENAME@** = for vaskâm:vaaskâ
Cx:0 <=> _ ([%^ÁI:|%^ÁE:]) %^FCD: ;     
          where Cx in (d n m t v j s š) ;

!rejected, look at this:
!!€ va^RVskâm^FCD^RLEN
!!€ vaaskâ000
!!€ njuolgâd^FCD^RVSH
!!€ njuolgâ000

	
"Final m in stems, smm to sm"
!!  **RULE: @RULENAME@** = 
m:0 <=>  s _ m [Triggers: - %^FCD:]* [.#.|%>]   ; !! 1) puttáás_min 
         s _   [Triggers: - %^FCD:]*      %>  m ; !! 2) stoorgâs_mân  sto%^RVrgâsm


"Wordfinal consonants part 1"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@**  e%^RVlâčč
Cx:0 <=> Vow: _  Cy:     (%^CLEN:) (%^RLEN:) (%^SLEN:|%^SVSH:) [.#.| %>] \Sgm: ; !! 1)
         Vow: _ [Cy|č:š] [Triggers: - %^FCD:]* [%>|#] [d|m|v] ; !! 2)jurdâččmân:jurdâšmân ju%^RVrdâčč%^RLEN%>mân
         Vow: _  Cy [%>|#] Cns ;                                !! 3)  šš>š in hárávušš>vetteđ 
	where Cx in ( d č š l h ) 
	      Cy in ( d č š l č )
		  matched ;


!!€ hárávušš>vetteđ
!!€ hárávu0š>vetteđ
!!€ konnjâl^CSH>ân
!!€ kon0jâl0>ân
!!€ suán^RCju^CLEN>n
!!€ suánnju0>n
!rejected, look at this: (changed a:0 to 2nd a)
!!€ haamit^SC^CSH^SVSH>ist
!!€ ha0mitt00>ist
!!€ su^RVkk4á^SV^WG^CLEN^SLEN>st
!!€ su0hháá000>st

! rejected: (but error in test: CLEN but p, and ^SVN???)
! kopp^RCâ^WG^CLEN^SVN>in
! ko0p0á000>in




!! ### Consonant lengthening rules
 


"Lengthening of half-long root consonant x:xx"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@** =  riččá piiru piirrun niisu niissun
%^RC:Cy <=> Vow:  Cx _ :Vow+ Sgm:* Triggers:* %^CLEN: ; ! RC  !! Cx, not Cx:  čeec%^RCi%^CLEN%>n
 	where Cx in ( b c č d g k l r s h m n đ v ŋ p š z ž t )  
 	      Cy in ( b c č d g k l r s h m n đ v ŋ p š z ž t ) 
 		  matched ;

"Lengthening of root consonant x:yy"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@** =  consonant lengthening after WG - h:vv, p:vv, c:ss
%^RC:Cy <=> Vow: Cx:Cy _ :Vow+ Cns:* [Triggers: - %^FCD:]* %^WG: %^CLEN: (%^VHIGH:|%^VBACK:) (%^RVSH:) ([%^SVLOW: |%^SLEN:]) %> [i:|s|u|o|ž |e h | e m |á] ;
	where Cx in ( h p c )
	      Cy in ( v v s ) 
		  matched ;

!kassa:kassaast
!!€ ka^RVss^RCa^SV^WG^CLEN^SLEN>st
!!€ ka0ss0aa000>st
!vahe vavveest
!!€ va^RVh^RCe^SV^WG^CLEN^SLEN>st
!!€ va0vvee000>st
!vahe vahheen
!!€ va^RVh^RCe^SV^CLEN^SLEN>n
!!€ va0hhee00>n

"Lengthening of consonant h5"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@** =    this one does not fit into the general rule because of h5:h
%^RC:Cy <=> Vow:  Cx:Cy _ Vow:+ Cns:* Triggers:* %^CLEN: ; 
	where Cx in ( h5 )  
	      Cy in ( h  )   
		  matched ;

!! *TEST:*
!!€ put^RCe^SVst^CLEN^SLEN>
!!€ putteest00>
!kiär%^RCun%^CLEN%>ttáá
!!€ ke^RVp^RCidm^CLEN^RLEN^SLEN>ân
!!€ keeppidm000>ân  
!kiehâ  kievváin
!!€ kieh^RCâ^WG^CLEN^SVLOW>in
!!€ kievvá000>in
!iše iššeest
!!€ i^RVšš^RCe^SV^WG^CLEN^SLEN>st
!!€ i0šš0ee000>st
!!€ kol^RCe^CLEN>
!!€ kolle0>
!!€ kiel^RCâ^CLEN>n
!!€ kiellâ0>n


"č:ij part 1"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@** =  
č:i <=> Vow: _ %^RC:  WeakGrade %^CLEN: ; !!  eeč%^RCi:eijijn eeč%^RCi%^WG%^CLEN%^SVLOW%>in

"Lengthening root consonant j:ij 1"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@** =  for saje:saijeen 
j:i <=> Vow: _ %^RC: :Vow (Cns:+) (%^SV:) Cns:* %^CLEN: ([%^RVSH:|%^RLEN:]) (%^SLEN:) [.#.| %>] ; !!Par Ess


"č:ij and j:ij part 2"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@** =  
%^RC:j <=> Vow: č:i _ WeakGrade %^CLEN: ; ! RC !! 1)  eeč%^RCi:eijijn
           Vow: j:i _ Vow:+ (%^SV:) Cns:*  %^CLEN: ; ! RC !! 2) syej%^RCi3%^CLEN%^RVSH%>in suoijijn

!! *Tests:*
!!€ sa^RVj^RCe^SV^CLEN^SLEN>n
!!€ sa0ijee00>n
!!€ pááj^RCá^CLEN>n
!!€ pááijá0>n
!!€ vaj^RCe^SVd^CLEN^SLEN>
!!€ vaijeed00>




"nj to nnj consonant lengthening"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@** =  special rule, suánju : suánnjun for Par and Ess
%^RC:n <=> Vow: n _ j RealVow: %^CLEN: %> [ d | n ] ; 



"Consonant lengthening after xx:x and xy:zy weak grade with x4 on upper side"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@** =   k4, č, p4  kukse:kuvssijn  
%^RC:Cx <=> Vow:  Cy:  Cz: _ WeakGrade %^CLEN:  ; 
        where Cy in ( č p  k m m ŋ h h h l l l h k4 k4 r r r v v ) 
              Cz in ( č p4 s p s k c t č c č p c s  š  c š t c č ) 
              Cx in ( j v  s p s k c t č c č p c s  š  c š t c č ) 
        matched ;


"Consonant lengthening xy:xyy"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@**  ( fix: døp Cz om til Cx)
%^RC:Cx <=> Vow:  Cy:  Cz: _ Vow:+ Cns:+ %^CLEN:  ;  
        where Cy in ( k m  m ŋ h h  h l l l h r r r v v ) 
              Cz in ( s p  s k c t  č c č p c c š t c č ) 
              Cx in ( s p  s k c t  č c č p c c š t c č ) 
        matched ;



!! ### Stem consonant and suffix consonant rules


"Assimilation of consonants t d š"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@**  delet t in front of -ttáá, avoid -tttáá
Cy:0  <=>  Sgm: _ (%^CSH:) (%^RLEN:) %> Cy Cy ;  
	where Cy in ( d t š)
		  matched ;

!!€ haamit>ttáá
!!€ haami0>ttáá



"Wordfinal consonants part 2"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@**  e%^RVlâčč cummâlâhč:cummâlâhš
č:š  <=>  Vow: [č:|h:] _ Triggers:* [.#.| %>] \Sgm: ; ! SC
          Vow:  č:0    _ Triggers:*       %> [d|m|v] ; ! SC jurdâččmân:jurdâšmân

"Final consonant x:xx"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@** =  pottáák potákkân  
%^SC:Cx <=> Cx _ Triggers:* [%>|.#.] ; ! SC
        where Cx in ( k l n p t ) ;

!rejected, check kahh- later XXX
! kahhaan^SC^CSH^RVSH>ist
! ka0ha0nj00>ist

"Clitic devoicing"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@** =  for focus particle bá to pá after unvoiced stem cns.
Cx:Cy <=> :UnvoicedCns (UnvoicedCns:) Triggers:* %> #: _ ;
      where Cx in (b6 d6 g6 )
      	    Cy in (p  t  k  )
	    matched ;

"Gerund devoicing"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@** =   dijn to tijn after stems in tšs
d:t <=> [t|š|s] %> Triggers:* _ i j n ;


!! ## Vowel rules
!  =============
!  =============

!! ### First syllable vowel shortening rules

!! *Tests:*
!!€ koonnjâl^CSH>ân
!!€ ko0n0jâl0>ân
!!€ kappeer^CSH^SVSH>ist
!!€ ka0p0er00>ist
!!€ čäällim^CSH>ist
!!€ čä00lim0>ist
!This is not correct, Check it:
!!€ muusik^SC^CSH^RVSH>ist
!!€ mu0sikk00>ist
! kahhaan^SC^CSH^RVSH>ist
! ka0ha0n0j00>ist
!aarrân:arânân
!!€ aarrân^CSH>ân
!!€ a00rân0>ân
!rejected:
!!€ kiirrâs^RVSH>ân
!!€ ki0rrâs0>ân
 
 
 
"Vowel shortening VV:V (e in own rule)"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@** = ráávhu- : rávhoid, käähir%^CSH%>id kuuđiâ%^RVSH%>žân
Vy:0 <=> Vx: _  Cns:+ [ Cns: - %^RC:0 ] [Vow: - u2:]          %^WG:  (%^CLEN:) %^SVLOW:       %> i: ;  
         Vx: _  Cns:+                   [Vow: - u2:]          %^WG:   %^CLEN:  %^RVSH:        %> [i:|e] ; 
         Vx: _  Cns:+                   [Vow: - u2:]+ Cns:*  (%^CSH:) %^RVSH: (%^SVLOW:)     [%>|.#.] ;  
         Vx: _ [Cns:+ - č:]             [Vow: - u2:]+ Cns:+ ([%^ÁI:|%^ÁE:]) %^CSH: (%^SVSH:) [%>|.#.] ; 
         Vx: _ [Cns:+ - č:]             [Vow: - u2:]+ Cns:+ ([%^ÁI:|%^ÁE:]) (%^FCD:) %^WG: %^RVSH:        [%>|.#.|#] ;
         Vx: _  Cns:+                   [Vow: - u2:]+        (%^WG:) (%^CLEN:)  %^RVSH: (%^SVSH:)         [%>|.#.|#] ; !  
  [Vx: - :i] _  Cns:+                   [Vow: - u2:]+        (%^WG:) (%^CLEN:) %^VHIGH: %^RVSH: (%^SVSH:) [%>|.#.|#] ; 
         Vx: _  Cns:+                    Vow          Cns:*  (%^WG:|%^CSH:) (%^CLEN:) %^VBACK:  %^RVSH:   [%>|.#.|#] ; !
     :Cns Vx _ %> i [j|d] ; !! 1. essee : esseid, suklaa : suklaid
       where Vx in ( a i o u á ä y A E I O U Á Ä ) 
             Vy in ( a i o u á ä y a e i o u á ä ) 
       matched ;

! 1. pááppár : pápárân viijđás%^ÁE%^WG%^RVSH>
! njääh^RCe^CLEN^RVSH>:njähhe>
! čäällu2^VBACK^RVSH>čč>im

"Long vowel shortening"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@** = (example?), no ^CSH, since that gives Vy:0
Vy:0 <=> Vx: _ [Cns: - č:] Cns:* (%^RC:) [Vow: - u2:]  %^WG:          %^RVSH: %^SVLOW: [%>|.#.] \e ; ! RV !! 2st stems
         Vx: _  Cns:+                    Vow:  Cns:    %^CSH:         %^RVSH: %^SVSH:  [%>|.#.] ; !! 3syll kaavpug:kavpugân 
         Vx: _  Cns:+                    Vow: (%^SV:) Cns:+ Vow: Cns: %^RVSH:          [%>|.#.] ; !! táálhudem koomerdem
       where Vx in ( a i o u y á ä ) 
             Vy in ( a i o u y á ä ) 
       matched ;

"e:0 in passive and elsewhere"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@** \\
e:0 <=> e: _ [Cns: - č:] Cns:* (%^RC:) [Vow: - u2:] %^WG:                             %^RVSH: %^SVLOW: [%>|.#.|#] \e ; !! 2st stems
        e: _  Cns:+                     u2:u      ([%^WG:|%^CSH:]) (%^CLEN:) %^VBACK: %^RVSH:          [%>|.#.|#] ; 
        e: _  Cns:+                     Vow:  Cns:   %^CSH:                           %^RVSH: %^SVSH:  [%>|.#.|#] ; !! kaavpug:kavpugân 
        e: _  Cns:+                     Vow: (%^SV:) Cns:+ Vow: Cns:                  %^RVSH:          [%>|.#.|#] ; !! táálhudem koomerdem
